Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Housing and  Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $60,184,619.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$286,189,342 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses for operations, from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscel-
laneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in this section, collected or  received by the Housing and Community Services De-
partment.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$21,868,790 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Housing and Community Services  Department for lottery
bonds.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$127,694,100 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal  funds other than those described in sections 2 and 6 of this
2019 Act collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated to the Housing and  Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $18,787,920
for debt service for bond-related activities.
SECTION 5a. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $1 is
established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  federal
funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in this section, collected
or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for debt service and related
costs for outstanding general obligation bonds  sold pursuant to Article XI-Q of the Oregon
Constitution.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5512 (SB 5512-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, expenditures by the Housing and
Community Services Department for the following are not limited:
(1) Payments for costs resulting from the sale and issuance or redemption of  bonds is-
sued under ORS 287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650 (2005 Edition).
(2) Payment of debt service  and redemption premium on bonds issued under ORS
287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650  (2005 Edition) and payments for the purchase of bonds
as provided in ORS 456.680.
(3) Loans and payments for purchasing, insuring and servicing loans  as provided in ORS
456.625, 456.627, 456.635, 456.690, 456.705, 456.715  and 456.717 and payments for the purchase
from lending institutions of securities backed  by residential loans as provided in ORS 456.635
(1).
(4) Advances for development costs made in accordance with ORS 456.710.
(5) Pass-through payments of federal rent subsidy moneys from the United  States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development.
(6) Payments for costs associated with asset protection.
SECTION 7.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5512 (SB 5512-A) Page 2